South Dakota, session 2026, HB1284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 35-4:
An individual may carry and consume an alcoholic beverage purchased in a bar or
lounge, as described in § 42-7A-37.1, in any other connected enterprise, owned or
operated by the same person, within the same building.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.